Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
575

UNIFORM
DESERTION AND NONSUPPORT ACT

(MODIFIED)

Section

575-1 Repealed

575-2 Prima facie evidence; sequestration of
money for

support of spouse or children

575-3 Complaint

575-4 Evidence; marriage, paternity, etc.

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next